Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 48.43.800 and 2022 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The commissioner may ((include an assessment of carriers'))require health carriers to annually report primary care expenditures in ((the)) previous ((plan year))calendar years or anticipated for ((the)) upcoming ((plan year in its reviews of health plan form or rate filings. In conducting the review, the commissioner must consider any definition of primary care expenditures and any primary care expenditure targets established under RCW 70.390.080))calendar years.(2) The commissioner may determine the form and content of carrier primary care expenditure reporting. In developing the form and content for reporting, the commissioner shall consider the definition of primary care expenditures and any primary care expenditure targets established under RCW 70.390.080 as well as primary care expenditure reporting systems implemented by the health care authority for medical assistance and employee benefits coverage administered under chapter 41.05 or 74.09 RCW.(3) Primary care expenditure reports submitted by carriers under this section are public information.--- END ---